Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1323.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 8.10. Advanced Practice Registered Nurse.--(a) The Board shall issue to each person who meets the following criteria a certificate setting forth that the person is certified as an advanced practice registered nurse:(1) the person holds a master's degree or post-master's degree; and(2) the person is licensed in one of the following 1234567891011121314151617181920 classifications:(i) Certified registered nurse practitioner. (ii) Clinical nurse specialist.(iii) Certified registered nurse anesthetist.(b) A person who is certified by the Board under subsection (a) is entitled to use the title "advanced practice registered nurse" and the letters "A.P.R.N." A record of each person certified as an advanced practice registered nurse in this Commonwealth shall be kept in the office of the Board and posted on the Board's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1323PN1515 - 2 - 1234567891011